Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.12.060

Rules—Mandatory provisions.

The office of student financial assistance shall adopt rules as may be necessary or appropriate for effecting the provisions of this chapter, and not in conflict with this chapter, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act. Such rules shall include provisions designed to make employment under the work-study program reasonably available, to the extent of available funds, to all eligible needy students in eligible postsecondary institutions. The rules shall include:

(1) Providing work under the state work-study program that will not result in the displacement of employed workers or impair existing contracts for services;

(2) Furnishing work only to a student who:

(a) Is capable, in the opinion of the eligible institution, of maintaining good standing in such course of study while employed under the program covered by the agreement; and

(b) Has been accepted for enrollment as at least a half-time student at the eligible institution or, in the case of a student already enrolled in and attending the eligible institution, is in good standing and in at least half-time attendance there either as an undergraduate, graduate or professional student; and

(c) Is not pursuing a degree in theology;

(3) Placing priority on providing:

(a) Work opportunities for students who are residents of the state of Washington as defined in RCW 28B.15.012 and 28B.15.013, particularly former foster youth as defined in *RCW 28B.92.060;

(b) Job placements in fields related to each student's academic or vocational pursuits, with an emphasis on off-campus job placements whenever appropriate; and

(c) Off-campus community service placements;

(4) To the extent practicable, limiting the proportion of state subsidy expended upon nonresident students to fifteen percent, or such less amount as specified in the biennial appropriations act;

(5) Provisions to assure that in the state institutions of higher education, utilization of this work-study program:

(a) Shall only supplement and not supplant classified positions under jurisdiction of chapter 41.06 RCW;

(b) That all positions established which are comparable shall be identified to a job classification under the director of personnel's classification plan and shall receive equal compensation;

(c) Shall not take place in any manner that would replace classified positions reduced due to lack of funds or work; and

(d) That work-study positions shall only be established at entry-level positions of the classified service unless the overall scope and responsibilities of the position indicate a higher level; and

(6) Provisions to encourage job placements in high employer demand occupations that meet Washington's economic development goals, including those in international trade and international relations. The office shall permit appropriate job placements in other states and other countries.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 146; 2009 c 172 s 1; 2005 c 93 s 4; 2002 c 354 s 224; 1994 c 130 s 6. Prior: 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 3; 1993 c 281 s 14; 1987 c 330 s 202; 1985 c 370 s 60; 1974 ex.s. c 177 s 6.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28B.92.060 was repealed by 2019 c 406 s 79.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Findings—Intent—2005 c 93: See note following RCW 74.13.570.

Short title—Headings, captions not law—Severability—Effective dates—2002 c 354: See RCW 41.80.907 through 41.80.910.

Effective date—1993 sp.s. c 18: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1993." [ 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 38.]

Effective date—1993 c 281: See note following RCW 41.06.022.

Construction—Application of rules—Severability—1987 c 330: See notes following RCW 28B.12.050.

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 177: See note following RCW 28B.12.010.